Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.900

Benefits not contractual right until July 1, 2006.

The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 242, Laws of 2004 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to July 1, 2006. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to July 1, 2006.

[ 2004 c 242 s 66.]